Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.050

Registered agent.

Each domestic corporation and foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state shall have and continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4107; 2009 c 202 s 2; 1993 c 356 s 15; 1982 c 35 s 125; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.